Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 4. Warning Signs

§ 921.
School zones.

Municipalities shall erect or cause to be erected on all public highways near a school warning signs conforming to the standards of the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices as provided in

23 V.S.A. § 1025

.

For the purposes of this section and

23 V.S.A. § 1025

, the term “school” shall include school district-operated prekindergarten program facilities owned or leased by a school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 34.

§ 922.
Furnishing signs.

The Agency is directed to procure a sufficient number of signs for the use of the several municipalities in carrying out the provisions of section 921 of this title.
It shall furnish the signs to the municipalities at cost.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 922a.
Warning signs designating persons with a disability.

Signs designating the presence of a person with a disability shall be erected only with the consent of the individual or guardian.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 119.